Hawaii statutes.
§412:2-505 Waiver of statewide
concentration limits under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended.
If the commissioner finds that waiver of the statewide concentration limits
under section 3(d) of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, is
necessary to prevent probable failure of the Hawaii financial institution, the
commissioner shall have the power to issue a waiver of those statewide
concentration limits. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 33, §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next